Washington statutes.
RCW 33.36.050

False statement affecting financial standing.

Any person who wilfully instigates, makes, circulates, or transmits to another or others any statement which the person knows to be false concerning the financial condition or affecting the financial standing of any association doing business in this state, or who wilfully counsels, aids, procures or induces another to start, transmit, or circulate any such statement which the person knows to be false, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1982 c 3 s 64; 1945 c 235 s 92; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-211. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 110.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.